District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1206.01

Establishment.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VI, § 601
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(b), 33 DCR 7241
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-74, § 3(a), 36 DCR 8117

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1561.

Prior Codifications